North Carolina, session 2025, HB516.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 20‑114.1 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(e) A person holding a motorcycle road guard certificate issued under G.S. 20-114.2 may
direct traffic while escorting a motorcycle group along public roadways on an approved route if
(i) the person meets the safety and equipment standards specified by the motorcycle road guard
certification program and (ii) the route has received approval from the chief of police of each
municipality through which the motorcycle group is proceeding, and where the route is outside
of a city, from the sheriff of each county through which the motorcycle group is proceeding."
SECTION 2. Article 3 of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 20-114.2. Motorcycle road guard certificate.
(a) The Division shall establish a motorcycle road guard certification program. This
program shall do the following:
(1) Establish qualifications for a person to obtain a motorcycle road guard
certificate. These qualifications shall include all of the following:
a. The person is at least 18 years old.
b. The person possesses a valid regular drivers license with a motorcycle
endorsement issued pursuant to G.S. 20-7.
c. The person completes a motorcycle road guard certification course
developed by the Division.
(2) Develop and offer a motorcycle road guard certification course and refresher
course.
(3) Establish safety and equipment standards for a motorcycle road guard while
directing traffic pursuant to G.S. 20-114.1(e).
(4) Establish procedures for a chief of police or sheriff to verify the validity of a
person's motorcycle road guard certification.
(b) A motorcycle road guard certificate shall expire after two years. The Division shall
require a renewal applicant to complete a motorcycle road guard certification refresher course
for renewal of the applicant's certificate.
(c) The Division is authorized to charge a fee for a motorcycle road guard certification
and certificate renewal.
*H516-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(d) The Division is authorized to certify an applicant for a motorcycle road guard
certification with the submission of evidence that the applicant has completed a course, approved
by the Commissioner, consistent with the instruction provided through the motorcycle road guard
certification program created by the Division. The Division shall maintain a list of courses
offered in this State which are approved by the Division."
SECTION 3. The Division of Motor Vehicles shall adopt rules to carry out the
provisions of this act.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 516-Second Edition